Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1882.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-4-903.1 of Title 10A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Any party seeking to effect a foster care placement of, or


termination of parental rights to, a child regardless of race or


political status under state law shall satisfy the court that active


efforts have been made to provide remedial services and


rehabilitative programs designed to prevent the breakup of the


child’s family and that these efforts have proved unsuccessful.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3384 BLB 1/15/2026 8:20:45 AM



Req. No. 3384 Page 1